Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2362
Public funds; depositories; security.

Whenever, by the laws of this state, any municipal corporation or other governmental subdivision of the state is authorized or required to obtain or accept from banks, capital stock financial institutions, or qualifying mutual financial institutions surety bonds or other bonds as security for deposits of public funds belonging to such municipal corporation or other governmental subdivision, the insurance or guarantee afforded to depositors in banks, capital stock financial institutions, or qualifying mutual financial institutions through the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, organized under the laws of the United States, shall be deemed and construed to be, for the purposes of such laws, a surety bond or bonds to the extent that such deposits are insured or guaranteed by such corporation, and for deposits so insured or guaranteed, no other surety bond or bonds or other security shall be required. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1935, c. 140, § 1, p. 515;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-2536;

R.S.1943, § 77-2362;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 75;

Laws 1992, LB 757, § 32;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 69;

Laws 2009, LB259, § 22.